Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.170

Compelling attendance of witnesses.

The court or judge shall have power to require and compel the attendance of witnesses, and to do all other acts necessary to determine the case.

[Code 1881 s 680; 1877 p 140 s 683; 1869 p 158 s 620; 1854 p 214 s 448; RRS s 1078.]

NOTES:

Witnesses, compelling attendance: Chapter 5.56 RCW.